Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-258.01
School lands; unsold; lease; duration.

If such land should not be sold according to the provisions of sections 72-208, 72-257, 72-257.01, and 72-258, then it shall be offered for lease as the Board of Educational Lands and Funds shall provide for a period of not less than three years nor more than eight years as the board, in its discretion, shall determine. No such leased land shall be subsequently offered for sale until the expiration of such lease.

Laws 1965, c. 435, § 4, p. 1387;

Laws 1973, LB 145, § 3.

Section held constitutional. State ex rel. Belker v. Board of Educational Lands & Funds, 184 Neb. 621, 171 N.W.2d 156 (1969).

Where school land is not sold, it can be offered for lease for a six-year period. Banks v. State, 181 Neb. 106, 147 N.W.2d 132 (1966).